incubator/apertium-asm-ben/apertium-asm-ben.ben.dix
		<pardef n="কর_vblex">

			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ছি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>			
			<e><p><l>ছিলাম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>		
			<e><p><l>লাম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>		
			<e><p><l>েছি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>		
			<e><p><l>লাম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ছিলাম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>েছিল</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>া<b/>হয়েছিল</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>েছে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>

		</pardef>

		<pardef n="হয়_vbser">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>			
	</pardefs>

		<e lm="আসা"><i>আসা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="লাফা"><i>লাফা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="উঠ"><i>উঠ</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="কাট"><i>কাট</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="কর"><i>কর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="কেন"><i>কেন</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="কাশি"><i>কাশি</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="টান"><i>টান</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="খাবা"><i>খাবা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="খোল"><i>খোল</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="হারা"><i>হারা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="খা"><i>খা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="গা"><i>গা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="পড়"><i>পড়</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="জা"><i>জা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ঘট"><i>ঘট</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="চল"><i>চল</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="লাগে"><i>লাগে</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="চেঁচা"><i>চেঁচা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="চুরি কর"><i>চুরি<b/>কর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="হাঁট"><i>হাঁট</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="লুকা"><i>লুকা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ছিনতাই কর"><i>ছিনতাই<b/>কর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ত্যাগ"><i>ত্যাগ</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="জাগ্"><i>জাগ্<b/>পা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ঝগড়া কর"><i>ঝগড়া<b/>কর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ঠক"><i>ঠক</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ঠেল"><i>ঠেল</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ভয় কর"><i>ভয়<b/>কর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ডুব"><i>ডুব</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="সাঁতার কাট"><i>সাঁতার<b/>কাট</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="চাপ"><i>চাপ</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="দেখ"><i>দেখ</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="দৌড়"><i>দৌড়</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="স্নান কর"><i>স্নান<b/>কর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="খসা"><i>খসা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ধর"><i>ধর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="রান্না কর"><i>রান্না<b/>কর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="পড়"><i>পড়</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="পরিচয়"><i>পরিচয়</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="পরিধান কর"><i>পরিধান<b/>কর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ফাট"><i>ফাট</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="বাজ"><i>বাজ</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="বাজা"><i>বাজা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="বানা"><i>বানা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="বস"><i>বস</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="লাগ"><i>লাগ</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="লাগে"><i>লাগে</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="লেখ"><i>লেখ</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ঘুমা"><i>ঘুমা</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="চিন্তা কর"><i>চিন্তা<b/>কর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="হাঁস"><i>হাঁস</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="হয়"><i>হয়</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="হ'ল"><i>হ'ল</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="হবে"><i>হবে</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="হয়ে গেল"><i>হয়ে<b/>গেল</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="হয়ে জাবে"><i>হয়ে<b/>জাবে</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="হয়েছিল"><i>হয়েছিল</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="হব"><i>হব</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="ভালোবাসি"><i>ভালোবাসি</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="থাম"><i>থাম</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="গ্রহণ কর"><i>গ্রহণ<b/>কর</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="বল"><i>বল</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="হত"><i>হত</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="নির্মান করেছিল"><i>নির্মান<b/>করেছিল</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ছিল"><i>ছিল</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="জানা যায়"><i>জানা<b/>যায়</i><par n="কর_vblex"/></e>
